Utah statutes.
31A-6a-110.   Rulemaking.

(1)  Pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commissioner may make rules necessary to assist in the enforcement of this chapter.

(2)  The commissioner may by rule or order, after a hearing, exempt certain service contract providers or service contract providers for a specific class of service contracts that are not otherwise exempt under Subsection 31A-1-103(3) from any provision of this title.  The commissioner may order substitute requirements on a finding that a particular provision of this title is not necessary for the protection of the public or that the substitute requirement is reasonably certain to provide equivalent protection to the public.

